output/dictionaries/Medzuslovjansky_KomboLatinicaKirilica.aff
FLAG long
SFX CH Y 81
SFX CH јдти шел .
SFX CH јдти шла .
SFX CH јдти шло .
SFX CH јдти шли .
SFX CH ти у .
SFX CH ти ем .
SFX CH ти еш .
SFX CH ти е .
SFX CH ти емо .
SFX CH ти ете .
SFX CH ти ут .
SFX CH ти ех .
SFX CH ти еше .
SFX CH ти ехмо .
SFX CH ти есте .
SFX CH ти еху .
SFX CH ти и .
SFX CH ти имо .
SFX CH ти ите .
SFX CH ти учи .
SFX CH ти учего .
SFX CH ти учему .
SFX CH ти учим .
SFX CH ти учем .
SFX CH ти учих .
SFX CH ти учими .
SFX CH ти уча .
SFX CH ти учу .
SFX CH ти учеј .
SFX CH ти учеју .
SFX CH ти уче .
SFX CH ти омы .
SFX CH ти омого .
SFX CH ти омому .
SFX CH ти омым .
SFX CH ти омом .
SFX CH ти омо .
SFX CH ти ома .
SFX CH ти ому .
SFX CH ти омој .
SFX CH ти омоју .
SFX CH ти оми .
SFX CH ти оме .
SFX CH ти омых .
SFX CH ти омым .
SFX CH ти омыми .
SFX CH ти омо .
SFX CH јдти шевши .
SFX CH јдти шевшего .
SFX CH јдти шевшему .
SFX CH јдти шевшим .
SFX CH јдти шевшем .
SFX CH јдти шевших .
SFX CH јдти шевшими .
SFX CH јдти шевша .
SFX CH јдти шевшу .
SFX CH јдти шевшеј .
SFX CH јдти шевшеју .
SFX CH јдти шевше .
SFX CH ти ены .
SFX CH ти еного .
SFX CH ти еному .
SFX CH ти еным .
SFX CH ти еном .
SFX CH ти ени .
SFX CH ти ене .
SFX CH ти еных .
SFX CH ти еными .
SFX CH ти ена .
SFX CH ти ену .
SFX CH ти еној .
SFX CH ти еноју .
SFX CH ти ено .
SFX CH ти енје/xPxE .
SFX CH ти енја/xPxE .
SFX CH ти енју/xPxE .
SFX CH ти енјем/xPxE .
SFX CH ти ениј/xPxE .
SFX CH ти енјам/xPxE .
SFX CH ти енјами/xPxE .
SFX CH ти енјах/xPxE .

SFX CI Y 11
SFX CI 0 0/xPxE .
SFX CI а о/xPxBxO .
SFX CI а ы/xPxE .
SFX CI а у/xPxE .
SFX CI ка ок/xPxE .
SFX CI а є/xPxE .
SFX CI 0 х/xPxE .
SFX CI 0 м/xPxE .
SFX CI а оју/xPxE .
SFX CI 0 ми/xPxE .
SFX CI а о/xPxE .

SFX CJ Y 19
SFX CJ 0 0/xPxE .
SFX CJ 0 е/xPxBxO .
SFX CJ онј нј/xPxE .
SFX CJ онј нје/xPxE .
SFX CJ 0 е/xPxE .
SFX CJ онј нја/xPxE .
SFX CJ 0 а/xPxE .
SFX CJ онј нјев/xPxE .
SFX CJ 0 ев/xPxE .
SFX CJ онј нју/xPxE .
SFX CJ 0 у/xPxE .
SFX CJ онј нјах/xPxE .
SFX CJ 0 ах/xPxE .
SFX CJ онј нјам/xPxE .
SFX CJ 0 ам/xPxE .
SFX CJ онј нјем/xPxE .
SFX CJ 0 ем/xPxE .
SFX CJ онј нјами/xPxE .
SFX CJ 0 ами/xPxE .

SFX CK Y 18
SFX CK 0 0/xPxE .
SFX CK о о/xPxBxO .
SFX CK хо ши/xPxE .
SFX CK хо шеса/xPxE .
SFX CK о а/xPxE .
SFX CK хо шесе/xPxE .
SFX CK хо шиј/xPxE .
SFX CK хо шес/xPxE .
SFX CK о у/xPxE .
SFX CK хо шеси/xPxE .
SFX CK хо шах/xPxE .
SFX CK хо шесах/xPxE .
SFX CK хо шам/xPxE .
SFX CK хо шесам/xPxE .
SFX CK 0 м/xPxE .
SFX CK хо шесем/xPxE .
SFX CK хо шами/xPxE .
SFX CK хо шесами/xPxE .

SFX CL Y 11
SFX CL 0 0/xPxE .
SFX CL а е/xPxBxO .
SFX CL а ы/xPxE .
SFX CL а у/xPxE .
SFX CL а 0 .
SFX CL а є/xPxE .
SFX CL 0 х/xPxE .
SFX CL 0 м/xPxE .
SFX CL а оју/xPxE .
SFX CL 0 ми/xPxE .
SFX CL а о/xPxE .

SFX CM Y 17
SFX CM 0 0/xPxE .
SFX CM е е/xPxBxO .
SFX CM е а/xPxE .
SFX CM це чеса/xPxE .
SFX CM це чесе/xPxE .
SFX CM е 0 .
SFX CM це чес/xPxE .
SFX CM е у/xPxE .
SFX CM це чеси/xPxE .
SFX CM е ах/xPxE .
SFX CM це чесах/xPxE .
SFX CM е ам/xPxE .
SFX CM це чесам/xPxE .
SFX CM 0 м/xPxE .
SFX CM це чесем/xPxE .
SFX CM е ами/xPxE .
SFX CM це чесами/xPxE .

SFX CN Y 71
SFX CN ти л .
SFX CN ти ла .
SFX CN ти ло .
SFX CN ти ли .
SFX CN ти у .
SFX CN гти жем .
SFX CN гти жеш .
SFX CN гти же .
SFX CN гти жемо .
SFX CN гти жете .
SFX CN ти ут .
SFX CN гти жех .
SFX CN гти жеше .
SFX CN гти жехмо .
SFX CN гти жесте .
SFX CN гти жеху .
SFX CN гти жи .
SFX CN гти жимо .
SFX CN гти жите .
SFX CN ти учи .
SFX CN ти учего .
SFX CN ти учему .
SFX CN ти учим .
SFX CN ти учем .
SFX CN ти учих .
SFX CN ти учими .
SFX CN ти уча .
SFX CN ти учу .
SFX CN ти учеј .
SFX CN ти учеју .
SFX CN ти уче .
SFX CN гти жемы .
SFX CN гти жемого .
SFX CN гти жемому .
SFX CN гти жемым .
SFX CN гти жемом .
SFX CN гти жемо .
SFX CN гти жема .
SFX CN гти жему .
SFX CN гти жемој .
SFX CN гти жемоју .
SFX CN гти жеми .
SFX CN гти жеме .
SFX CN гти жемых .
SFX CN гти жемым .
SFX CN гти жемыми .
SFX CN ти ши .
SFX CN ти ша .
SFX CN ти ше .
SFX CN гти жены .
SFX CN гти женого .
SFX CN гти женому .
SFX CN гти женым .
SFX CN гти женом .
SFX CN гти жени .
SFX CN гти жене .
SFX CN гти женых .
SFX CN гти жеными .
SFX CN гти жена .
SFX CN гти жену .
SFX CN гти женој .
SFX CN гти женоју .
SFX CN гти жено .
SFX CN гти женје/xPxE .
SFX CN гти женја/xPxE .
SFX CN гти женју/xPxE .
SFX CN гти женјем/xPxE .
SFX CN гти жениј/xPxE .
SFX CN гти женјам/xPxE .
SFX CN гти женјами/xPxE .
SFX CN гти женјах/xPxE .

SFX CO Y 6
SFX CO 0 0/xPxE .
SFX CO 0 о/xPxBxO .
SFX CO ес са/xPxE .
SFX CO ес су/xPxE .
SFX CO ес сом/xPxE .
SFX CO ес се/xPxE .

SFX CP Y 12
SFX CP 0 е .
SFX CP 0 а .
SFX CP 0 его .
SFX CP 0 у .
SFX CP 0 еј .
SFX CP 0 ем .
SFX CP 0 ему .
SFX CP 0 им .
SFX CP 0 еју .
SFX CP 0 и .
SFX CP 0 их .
SFX CP 0 ими .

SFX CQ Y 62
SFX CQ ти л .
SFX CQ ти ла .
SFX CQ ти ло .
SFX CQ ти ли .
SFX CQ лєти елју .
SFX CQ лєти елјем .
SFX CQ лєти елјеш .
SFX CQ лєти елје .
SFX CQ лєти елјемо .
SFX CQ лєти елјете .
SFX CQ лєти елјут .
SFX CQ ти х .
SFX CQ ти ше .
SFX CQ ти хмо .
SFX CQ ти сте .
SFX CQ ти ху .
SFX CQ лєти елј .
SFX CQ лєти елјмо .
SFX CQ лєти елјте .
SFX CQ лєти елјучи .
SFX CQ лєти елјучего .
SFX CQ лєти елјучему .
SFX CQ лєти елјучим .
SFX CQ лєти елјучем .
SFX CQ лєти елјучих .
SFX CQ лєти елјучими .
SFX CQ лєти елјуча .
SFX CQ лєти елјучу .
SFX CQ лєти елјучеј .
SFX CQ лєти елјучеју .
SFX CQ лєти елјуче .
SFX CQ лєти елјемы .
SFX CQ лєти елјемого .
SFX CQ лєти елјемому .
SFX CQ лєти елјемым .
SFX CQ лєти елјемом .
SFX CQ лєти елјемо .
SFX CQ лєти елјема .
SFX CQ лєти елјему .
SFX CQ лєти елјемој .
SFX CQ лєти елјемоју .
SFX CQ лєти елјеми .
SFX CQ лєти елјеме .
SFX CQ лєти елјемых .
SFX CQ лєти елјемым .
SFX CQ лєти елјемыми .
SFX CQ ти вши .
SFX CQ ти вшего .
SFX CQ ти вшему .
SFX CQ ти вшим .
SFX CQ ти вшем .
SFX CQ ти вших .
SFX CQ ти вшими .
SFX CQ ти вша .
SFX CQ ти вшу .
SFX CQ ти вшеј .
SFX CQ ти вшеју .
SFX CQ ти вше .
SFX CQ и ы .
SFX CQ и а .
SFX CQ и о .
SFX CQ и је .

SFX CR Y 11
SFX CR 0 0/xPxE .
SFX CR а е/xPxBxO .
SFX CR а е/xPxE .
SFX CR а у/xPxE .
SFX CR ја еј/xPxE .
SFX CR а и/xPxE .
SFX CR 0 х/xPxE .
SFX CR 0 м/xPxE .
SFX CR а еју/xPxE .
SFX CR 0 ми/xPxE .
SFX CR а о/xPxE .

SFX CS Y 11
SFX CS 0 0/xPxE .
SFX CS а о/xPxBxO .
SFX CS а ы/xPxE .
SFX CS а у/xPxE .
SFX CS ла ол/xPxE .
SFX CS а є/xPxE .
SFX CS 0 х/xPxE .
SFX CS 0 м/xPxE .
SFX CS а оју/xPxE .
SFX CS 0 ми/xPxE .
SFX CS а о/xPxE .

SFX CT Y 53
SFX CT ети л .
SFX CT ети ла .
SFX CT ети ло .
SFX CT ети ли .
SFX CT ети у .
SFX CT ти м .
SFX CT ти ш .
SFX CT ти 0 .
SFX CT ти мо .
SFX CT и е .
SFX CT ети ут .
SFX CT ти х .
SFX CT ти ше .
SFX CT ти хмо .
SFX CT ти сте .
SFX CT ти ху .
SFX CT ети и .
SFX CT ети имо .
SFX CT ети ите .
SFX CT ети учи .
SFX CT ети учего .
SFX CT ети учему .
SFX CT ети учим .
SFX CT ети учем .
SFX CT ети учих .
SFX CT ети учими .
SFX CT ети уча .
SFX CT ети учу .
SFX CT ети учеј .
SFX CT ети учеју .
SFX CT ети уче .
SFX CT ти мы .
SFX CT ти мого .
SFX CT ти мому .
SFX CT ти мым .
SFX CT ти мом .
SFX CT ти мо .
SFX CT ти ма .
SFX CT ти му .
SFX CT ти мој .
SFX CT ти моју .
SFX CT ти ми .
SFX CT ти ме .
SFX CT ти мых .
SFX CT ти мым .
SFX CT ти мыми .
SFX CT ети ши .
SFX CT ети ша .
SFX CT ети ше .
SFX CT ети ты .
SFX CT ети та .
SFX CT ети то .
SFX CT ети тје .

SFX CU Y 2
SFX CU с м .
SFX CU с ми .

SFX CV Y 28
SFX CV 0 0/xPxE .
SFX CV ы о/xBxPxE .
SFX CV ы а/xPxE .
SFX CV ы ого/xPxE .
SFX CV ы у/xPxE .
SFX CV ы ој/xPxE .
SFX CV ы ом/xPxE .
SFX CV ы ому/xPxE .
SFX CV 0 м/xPxE .
SFX CV ы оју/xPxE .
SFX CV ы и/xPxE .
SFX CV ы е/xPxE .
SFX CV 0 х/xPxE .
SFX CV 0 ми/xPxE .
SFX CV кы чєјши/zx .
SFX CV кы чєјшего/zx .
SFX CV кы чєјшему/zx .
SFX CV кы чєјшим/zx .
SFX CV кы чєјшем/zx .
SFX CV кы чєјше/zx .
SFX CV кы чєјша/zx .
SFX CV кы чєјшу/zx .
SFX CV кы чєјшеј/zx .
SFX CV кы чєјшеју/zx .
SFX CV кы чєјших/zx .
SFX CV кы чєјшим/zx .
SFX CV кы чєјшими/zx .
SFX CV кы чеје/zx .
