output/dictionaries/Medzuslovjansky_KomboLatinicaKirilica.dic
најдти/CH
клєтка/CI
крабка/CI
огонј/CJ
ухо/CK
краджа/CL
лице/CM
могти/CN
овес/CO
мој/CP
млєти/CQ
канја/CR
мгла/CS
умрети/CT
нас/CU
нєкакы/CV
ничиј/CP
шапка/CI
свој/CP
пријдти/CH
поступка/CI
чиј/CP
рджа/CL
сєтка/CI
иночиј/CP
нуджа/CL
свинја/CR
волја/CR
цибулја/CR
прєдојдти/CH
ваш/CP
уступка/CI
столка/CI
прєјдти/CH
проститутка/CI
кухнја/CR
капја/CR
наш/CP
доска/CI
студнја/CR
ролја/CR
тениска/CI
вєтка/CI
пустынја/CR
помогти/CN
твој/CP
катка/CI
земја/CR
меджа/CL
трговја/CR
дынја/CR
пєснја/CR
черешнја/CR
чаплја/CR
тетка/CI
вечерја/CR
бурја/CR
блондинка/CI
болинка/CI
лєска/CI
једнакы/CV
нєчиј/CP
лодка/CI
сємја/CR
бетономешалка/CI
такы/CV
нырка/CI
развєдка/CI
никакы/CV
повєдка/CI
купалјнја/CR
кулја/CR
каварнја/CR
горечнја/CR
полјанка/CI
шунка/CI
копалјнја/CR
трети/CT
цукрка/CI
хвилја/CR
жеджа/CL
појдти/CH
винтовка/CI
лєчилјнја/CR
корка/CI
всакы/CV
читалјнја/CR
мразилка/CI
водка/CI
честка/CI
сборка/CI
чрка/CI
шчетка/CI
кошулја/CR
стригти/CN
остригти/CN
молнја/CR
рамка/CI
спалјнја/CR
миска/CI
свєтилка/CI
запалка/CI
господынја/CR
дојдти/CH
сојдти/CH
возојдти/CH
зајдти/CH
пројдти/CH
ујдти/CH
изтрети/CT
доставка/CI
смлєти/CQ
врвка/CI
кој/CP
нєкој/CP
посылка/CI
изумрети/CT
сотка/CI
сотнја/CR
загадка/CI
похыбка/CI
калка/CI
гладовка/CI
записка/CI
албанка/CI
американка/CI
индијанка/CI
автостраховка/CI
булгарка/CI
цвекла/CS
чајилјнја/CR
чуджинка/CI
дочерка/CI
горка/CI
гостилјнја/CR
граджанка/CI
инакы/CV
изставка/CI
кнегынја/CR
конопја/CR
лицемєрка/CI
литванка/CI
лобанја/CR
мадјарка/CI
мучилјнја/CR
недєлја/CR
оземја/CR
поцєлувка/CI
подписка/CI
поправка/CI
прєгледка/CI
прєстрєлка/CI
сказка/CI
слизгалка/CI
скрипка/CI
словенка/CI
словјанка/CI
соска/CI
шнурка/CI
типка/CI
јасновидка/CI
изгледка/CI
ветеранка/CI
заложилјнја/CR
будка/CI
дикы/CV
главоломка/CI
највеликы/CV
стрыјенка/CI
тетенка/CI
ујенка/CI
находка/CI
пикировка/CI
инструкторка/CI
сєдилјнја/CR
португалка/CI
самогласка/CI
согласка/CI
сугласка/CI
выјдти/CH
совка/CI
бутылка/CI
манєрка/CI
бронја/CR
тврджа/CL
одєджа/CL
коликоракы/CV
прєдрастка/CI
аристократка/CI
арка/CI
двугласка/CI
фиалка/CI
галузка/CI
гласка/CI
гонка/CI
горєлка/CI
графитка/CI
губка/CI
христијанка/CI
изсмєвка/CI
кнопка/CI
нитка/CI
острєгти/CN
подрастка/CI
поврхнја/CR
прєвозојдти/CH
сходка/CI
саджа/CL
селјанка/CI
скринја/CR
возрастка/CI
вєшалка/CI
везка/CI
вишнја/CR
вртка/CI
заклјучилјнја/CR
жаровка/CI
зорја/CR
жужелка/CI
овакы/CV
онакы/CV
коликы/CV
селикы/CV
толикы/CV
оволикы/CV
оноликы/CV
вселикы/CV
иноликы/CV
метла/CS
одкрытка/CI
овчарнја/CR
прирастка/CI
улја/CR
богомолка/CI
легти/CN
личинка/CI
мєрка/CI
многоракы/CV
налегти/CN
недомолвка/CI
подливка/CI
поливка/CI
прємогти/CN
разлегти/CN
месарнја/CR
пекарнја/CR
подпорка/CI
разпрја/CR
впрегти/CN
запонка/CI
запрегти/CN
милја/CR
норка/CI
протрети/CT
рысованка/CI
стрєгти/CN
повезка/CI
неволја/CR
кукла/CS
марионетка/CI
марка/CI
наковалјнја/CR
ногавка/CI
фасолја/CR
палатка/CI
чекалјнја/CR
чрвеногрлка/CI
засувка/CI
походка/CI
агитка/CI
активистка/CI
акушерка/CI
банја/CR
банка/CI
безрукы/CV
булка/CI
чечетка/CI
дропја/CR
голтка/CI
господжа/CL
ходулја/CR
игуменја/CR
изнемогти/CN
једнорукы/CV
јутренја/CR
кавка/CI
костка/CI
ковалјнја/CR
купја/CR
кузнја/CR
ласка/CI
лазнја/CR
лопатка/CI
лыска/CI
маршрутка/CI
медалистка/CI
мешалка/CI
модистка/CI
наливка/CI
натрети/CT
невеликы/CV
новинка/CI
обтрети/CT
оцєнка/CI
одстригти/CN
одтрети/CT
орєховка/CI
палка/CI
рабынја/CR
размлєти/CQ
разсылка/CI
разтрети/CT
смогти/CN
снєжинка/CI
вафлја/CR
валерианка/CI
ванилја/CR
викунја/CR
воджа/CL
вставка/CI
закуска/CI
замрети/CT
зубровка/CI
боханка/CI
книгарнја/CR
преджа/CL
покупка/CI
лєворукы/CV
праворукы/CV
деснорукы/CV
флотилја/CR
пианистка/CI
вегетарианка/CI
изпрегти/CN
визажистка/CI
измогти/CN
рулетка/CI
таблетка/CI
гаргулја/CR
креветка/CI
крижевка/CI
утрети/CT
пристригти/CN
тополја/CR
милостынја/CR
шминка/CI
монахынја/CR
примєтка/CI
сколзавка/CI
челја/CR
опатка/CI
понєкој/CP
сбирка/CI
всекакы/CV
затворка/CI
подказка/CI
разојдти/CH
фреска/CI
пивоварнја/CR
алтанка/CI
лјутнја/CR
полусамогласка/CI
саблја/CR
сосиска/CI
челка/CI
плєвнја/CR
датулја/CR
рєпка/CI
партнерка/CI
факлја/CR
главнја/CR
обшивка/CI
сукнја/CR
скотобојнја/CR
дупја/CR
колєбанка/CI
излегти/CN
келнерка/CI
африканка/CI
изнајдти/CH
марулја/CR
